Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201744-5224
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act are to promote the availability of health insurance coverage to small employers regardless of their health status or claims experience, to prevent abusive rating practices, to require disclosure of rating practices to purchasers, to establish rules regarding renewability of coverage, to establish limitations on the use of preexisting condition exclusions, to provide for development of basic and standard health benefit plans to be offered to all small employers, and to improve the overall fairness and efficiency of the small group health insurance market. The act is not intended to provide a comprehensive solution to the problem of affordability of health care or health insurance.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 6.